Florida, session 2026, HB1285.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (6) of section 403.0855, Florida
Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (7), and a new
subsection (6) is added to that section, to read:
403.0855 Biosolids management.—
(6) The department may not issue or renew a permit for a
land application site which authorizes disposal or land
application of septage, as defined in s. 381.0065(2), as Class B
biosolids if there is a permitted wastewater treatment facility
that accepts septage for higher levels of treatment which is:
(a) Less than 30 miles from a proposed Class B biosolids
land application site;
(b) Owned or operated by the Federal Government or a
federal agency, a state government body or agency, or a
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1285 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1285 2026 Legislature
political subdivision of this state; and
(c) Not defunct, used for other purposes, or out of
capacity.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2027.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1285 -02-er